Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 14 Public Buildings Authority [Repealed.]

37-14-1 — 37-14-25.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 163, §§ 1-17, 19, 20, 22; P.L. 1963, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 77, §§ 1-8; P.L. 1978, ch. 254, §§ 1-11; P.L. 1979, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 85, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 293, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 15, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 3, effective July 1, 1997. For present comparable provisions, see §

35-8.1-8.1

et seq.